Utah statutes.
16-6a-1512.   Merger of foreign nonprofit corporations authorized to conduct
affairs in this state.
(1)  If two or more foreign nonprofit corporations authorized to conduct
affairs in this state are a party to a statutory merger permitted by the laws
of the state or country under the laws of which they are incorporated within
30 days after the merger becomes effective, the surviving nonprofit
corporation shall file with the division a certificate of fact of merger
certified by the proper officer of the state or country under the laws of
which the statutory merger was effected.
(2)  It is not necessary for a foreign nonprofit corporation authorized to
conduct affairs in this state that is a party to a statutory merger described
in Subsection (1) to procure a new or amended certificate of authority to
conduct affairs in this state unless the name of the surviving nonprofit
corporation is changed by the statutory merger.
